Hawaii, session 2025, HB1249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that conflicts and wars in various parts of the world pose threats to continued stability and peace across the globe, including Hawaii.  In 2018, Hawaii residents received an emergency alert notification of a "ballistic missile threat inbound to Hawaii."  The alert remained in effect for thirty-eight minutes and thirteen seconds, during which many people prepared for an imminent attack. In the face of growing threats such as these, the legislature believes the state must better prepare itself for potential attacks and disasters, however unlikely they may seem. The legislature further finds that it is particularly important for our public schools to develop disaster and emergency preparedness plans to ensure the safety of the nearly 180,000 students under their care.  The legislature notes that time is of the essence in the event of a nuclear attack or other disaster, so the issuance of a disaster plan will ensure that students, staff, and parents know what to do in the case of an emergency. A clear plan will help to prevent chaotic and dangerous scenarios in which parents rush to schools to pick up their children, causing traffic buildups and wasting precious time that could be better used seeking shelter from the disaster. The legislature further finds that if any disaster, whether natural or human-made, were to harm Hawaii's cargo shipping harbors, the State would likely encounter difficulties in receiving supplies as most of the State's food and other provisions arrive by ship.  Therefore, it is necessary for public schools to ensure that they have sufficient emergency goods available to last during the initial phase of a disaster. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require each public school in the State to develop a disaster and attack preparedness plan by January 1, 2026; (2)  Require each public school to maintain at least a forty-eight hour supply of emergency goods in its facilities; and (3)  Make an appropriation for the purchase of emergency goods for public schools. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to subpart C of part IV to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Emergency measures; disaster and attack preparedness.  (a)  Beginning July 1, 2026, each public school shall implement a disaster and attack preparedness plan in consultation with the state office of homeland security and the Hawaii emergency management agency.  The plan shall include: (1)  Procedures to protect the health and safety of students, staff members, and other individuals; (2)  Procedures for establishing and maintaining communication with county, state, and federal emergency response agencies; (3)  Procedures to ensure adequate resources for staffing and supplies in the case of a disaster, including: (A)  Assigned responsibilities for each staff member; and (B)  Instructions for the evacuation, transport, or transfer of students, if necessary; (4)  Orientation and proper instruction for all personnel employed by the public school; and (5)  Shelter-in-place drills for students and staff, to be held at least twice annually. (b)  Each public school shall maintain in its facilities a supply of emergency goods sufficient to last at least forty‑eight hours following an attack or disaster. (c)  As used in this section: "Attack" has the same meaning as in section 128A-2. "Disaster" has the same meaning as in section 127A-2. "Emergency goods" means water, food, medical supplies, and other items the department deems necessary for the health, safety, and welfare of students and employees." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $        or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purchase of a forty-eight hour supply of emergency goods for each school facility. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________